Florida, session 2026, SB124.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1), 26 subsections (2), (4), and (7), paragraph (b) of subsection (9), 27 and paragraph (d) of subsection (10) of section 1002.37, Florida 28 Statutes, are amended to read: 29 1002.37âThe Florida Virtual School.â 30 (1) 31 (b)âThe mission of the Florida Virtual School is to provide 32 students with technology-based educational opportunities to gain 33 the knowledge and skills necessary to succeed. The school shall 34 serve all students any student in the state who meet meets the 35 profile for success in this educational delivery context and 36 shall give priority to: 37 1.âStudents who need expanded access to courses in order to 38 meet their educational goals, such as home education students 39 and students in inner-city and rural high schools who do not 40 have access to higher-level courses. 41 2.âStudents seeking accelerated access in order to obtain a 42 high school diploma at least one semester early. 43 3.âStudents who are children of an active duty member of 44 the United States Armed Forces who is not stationed in this 45 state whose home of record or state of legal residence is 46 Florida. 47 (c)âTo ensure parents and students are informed of the 48 opportunities offered by the Florida Virtual School, the 49 commissioner shall provide the board of trustees of the Florida 50 Virtual School access to the records of public school students 51 in a format prescribed by the board of trustees. 52 53 The board of trustees of the Florida Virtual School shall 54 identify appropriate performance measures and standards based on 55 student achievement that reflect the schoolâs statutory mission 56 and priorities, and shall implement an accountability system for 57 the school that includes assessment of its effectiveness and 58 efficiency in providing quality services that encourage high 59 student achievement, seamless articulation, and maximum access. 60 (2)âThe Florida Virtual School shall be governed by a board 61 of trustees consisting comprised of seven members appointed by 62 the Governor to 4-year staggered terms. The board of trustees 63 shall be a public agency entitled to sovereign immunity pursuant 64 to s. 768.28, and board members shall be public officers who 65 shall bear fiduciary responsibility for the Florida Virtual 66 School. The board of trustees shall have the following powers 67 and duties: 68 (a)1.âThe board of trustees shall meet at least 4 times 69 each year, upon the call of the board chair, or at the request 70 of a majority of the board membership, or at the request of the 71 president and chief executive officer of the Florida Virtual 72 School. 73 2.âThe fiscal year for the Florida Virtual School shall be 74 the state fiscal year as provided in s. 216.011(1)(q). 75 (b)âThe board of trustees shall be responsible for the 76 Florida Virtual Schoolâs development of a state-of-the-art 77 technology-based education delivery system that is cost 78 effective, educationally sound, marketable, and capable of 79 sustaining a self-sufficient delivery system through the Florida 80 Education Finance Program and other supplemental funding 81 sources. 82 (c)âThe board of trustees shall aggressively seek avenues 83 to generate revenue to support its future endeavors, and shall 84 enter into agreements with distance learning providers. The 85 board of trustees may acquire, enjoy, use, and dispose of 86 patents, copyrights, and trademarks and any licenses and other 87 rights or interests thereunder or therein. Ownership of all such 88 patents, copyrights, trademarks, licenses, and rights or 89 interests thereunder or therein shall vest in the state, with 90 the board of trustees having full right of use and full right to 91 retain the revenues derived therefrom. Any funds realized from 92 patents, copyrights, trademarks, or licenses shall be considered 93 internal funds as provided in s. 1011.07. Such funds shall be 94 used to support the schoolâs mission and its marketing, and 95 research, and development activities in order to improve 96 courseware and services to its students. 97 (d)âThe board of trustees shall be responsible for the 98 administration and control of all local school funds derived 99 from all activities or sources and shall prescribe the 100 principles and procedures to be followed in administering these 101 funds. 102 (e)âThe Florida Virtual School may accrue supplemental 103 revenue from direct-support organizations and supplemental 104 support organizations, which include, but are not limited to, 105 alumni associations, foundations, parent-teacher associations, 106 and booster associations. The governing body of each direct 107 support and supplemental support organization shall recommend 108 the expenditure of moneys collected by the organization for the 109 benefit of the school. Such expenditures shall be contingent 110 upon the review and approval of the president and chief 111 executive officer of the Florida Virtual School or authorized 112 designees executive director. The executive director may 113 override any proposed expenditure of the organization that would 114 violate Florida law or breach sound educational management. 115 (f)âIn accordance with law and rules of the State Board of 116 Education, the board of trustees shall administer and maintain 117 personnel programs for all employees of the board of trustees 118 and the Florida Virtual School. The board of trustees may adopt 119 rules, policies, and procedures related to the appointment, 120 employment, and removal of personnel. 121 1.âThe board of trustees shall determine the compensation, 122 including salaries and fringe benefits, and other conditions of 123 employment for such personnel. 124 2.âThe board of trustees may establish and maintain a 125 personnel loan or exchange program by which persons employed by 126 the board of trustees for the Florida Virtual School as academic 127 administrative and instructional staff may be loaned to, or 128 exchanged with persons employed in like capacities by, public 129 agencies either within or without this state, or by private 130 industry. With respect to public agency employees, the program 131 authorized by this subparagraph shall be consistent with the 132 requirements of part II of chapter 112. The salary and benefits 133 of board of trustees personnel participating in the loan or 134 exchange program shall be continued during the period of time 135 they participate in a loan or exchange program, and such 136 personnel shall be deemed to have no break in creditable or 137 continuous service or employment during such time. The salary 138 and benefits of persons participating in the personnel loan or 139 exchange program who are employed by public agencies or private 140 industry shall be paid by the originating employers of those 141 participants, and such personnel shall be deemed to have no 142 break in creditable or continuous service or employment during 143 such time. 144 3.âThe employment of all Florida Virtual School academic 145 administrative and instructional personnel or administrative 146 personnel, as those terms are defined in s. 1012.01(2) and (3), 147 respectively shall be subject to rejection for cause by the 148 board of trustees, and shall be subject to policies of the board 149 of trustees relative to certification, tenure, leaves of 150 absence, sabbaticals, remuneration, and such other conditions of 151 employment as the board of trustees deems necessary and proper, 152 not inconsistent with law. 153 4.âEach person employed by the board of trustees in an 154 academic administrative or instructional capacity with the 155 Florida Virtual School shall be entitled to a contract as 156 provided by policies rules of the board of trustees. 157 5.âAll employees except temporary, seasonal, and student 158 employees must may be state employees for the purpose of being 159 eligible to participate in the Florida Retirement System and 160 receive benefits. The classification and pay plan, including 161 terminal leave and other benefits, and any amendments thereto, 162 shall be subject to review and approval by the Department of 163 Management Services and the Executive Office of the Governor 164 prior to adoption. 165 (g)âThe board of trustees shall establish priorities for 166 admission of students in accordance with paragraph (1)(b). 167 (h)âThe board of trustees shall establish and distribute to 168 all school districts and high schools in the state procedures 169 for enrollment of students in courses offered by the Florida 170 Virtual School. 171 (h)(i)âThe board of trustees shall establish criteria 172 defining the elements of an approved franchise. The board of 173 trustees may enter into contracts and franchise agreements with 174 Florida district school boards and other public and private 175 entities and governmental agencies and may establish the terms 176 and conditions governing such contracts or agreements. The board 177 of trustees shall establish the performance and accountability 178 measures and report the performance of each school district 179 franchise to the Commissioner of Education. 180 (i)(j)âThe board of trustees shall submit to the State 181 Board of Education both forecasted and actual enrollments and 182 credit completions for the Florida Virtual School, according to 183 procedures established by the State Board of Education. At a 184 minimum, such procedures must include the number of public, 185 private, and home education students served by program and by 186 county of residence. 187 (j)(k)âThe board of trustees shall provide for the content 188 and custody of student and employee personnel records. Student 189 records shall be subject to the provisions of s. 1002.22. 190 Employee records shall be subject to the provisions of s. 191 1012.31. 192 (k)(l)âThe financial records and accounts of the Florida 193 Virtual School shall be maintained under the direction of the 194 board of trustees and under rules adopted by the State Board of 195 Education for the uniform system of financial records and 196 accounts for the schools of the state. 197 198 The Governor shall designate the initial chair of the board of 199 trustees to serve a term of 4 years. Members of the board of 200 trustees shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed 201 for per diem and travel expenses pursuant to s. 112.061. The 202 board of trustees shall be a body corporate with all the powers 203 of a body corporate and such authority as is needed for the 204 proper operation and improvement of the Florida Virtual School. 205 The board of trustees is specifically authorized to adopt rules, 206 policies, and procedures, consistent with law and rules of the 207 State Board of Education related to governance, personnel, 208 budget and finance, administration, programs, curriculum and 209 instruction, travel and purchasing, technology, students, 210 contracts and grants, and property as necessary for optimal, 211 efficient operation of the Florida Virtual School. Tangible 212 personal property owned by the board of trustees shall be 213 subject to the provisions of chapter 273. 214 (4)âSchool districts operating a virtual school that is an 215 approved franchise of the Florida Virtual School may count full 216 time equivalent students, as provided in paragraph (3)(a), if 217 such school has been certified as an approved franchise by the 218 Commissioner of Education based on criteria established by the 219 board of trustees pursuant to paragraph (2)(h) (2)(i). 220 (7)âThe board of trustees shall annually submit to the 221 Governor, the Legislature, the Commissioner of Education, and 222 the State Board of Education the audit report prepared pursuant 223 to subsection (6) and a complete and detailed report setting 224 forth: 225 (a)âthe operations and accomplishments of the Florida 226 Virtual School within the state and those occurring outside the 227 state as Florida Virtual School Global. 228 (b)âThe marketing and operational plan for the Florida 229 Virtual School and Florida Virtual School Global, including 230 recommendations regarding methods for improving the delivery of 231 education through the Internet and other distance learning 232 technology. 233 (c)âThe assets and liabilities of the Florida Virtual 234 School and Florida Virtual School Global at the end of the 235 fiscal year. 236 (d)âRecommendations regarding the unit cost of providing 237 services to students through the Florida Virtual School and 238 Florida Virtual School Global. In order to most effectively 239 develop public policy regarding any future funding of the 240 Florida Virtual School, it is imperative that the cost of the 241 program is accurately identified. The identified cost of the 242 program must be based on reliable data. 243 (e)âRecommendations regarding an accountability mechanism 244 to assess the effectiveness of the services provided by the 245 Florida Virtual School and Florida Virtual School Global. 246 (9) 247 (b)âFor students receiving full-time or part-time 248 instruction in kindergarten through grade 5 and students 249 receiving full-time instruction in kindergarten through grade 12 250 from the Florida Virtual School, the full-time equivalent 251 student enrollment calculated under this subsection is subject 252 to the requirements in s. 1011.61(3). 253 (10) 254 (d)âUnless an alternative testing site is mutually agreed 255 to by the Florida Virtual School and the school district or as 256 contracted under s. 1008.24, all industry certification 257 examinations, national assessments, progress monitoring under s. 258 1008.25(9), and statewide assessments must be taken at the 259 school to which the student would be assigned according to 260 district school board attendance areas. A school district must 261 provide the student with access to the schoolâs testing 262 facilities, a test administrator, and the date and time of the 263 administration of progress monitoring and each examination or 264 assessment. 265 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.